src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Morphology

## Multicharacter symbols

### Sõnaliik / Part of speech

* `+N `: nimisõna		/ substantive		
* `+A `: omadussõna		/ adjective		
* `+Num `: arvsõna		/ numeral
* `+Pron `: asesõna		/ pronoun		
* `+V `: tegusõna 		/ verb			
* `+Adv `: määrsõna		/ adverb		
* `+Interj `: hüüdsõna		/ interjection		
* `+CC `: rinnastav sidesõna		/ co-ordinating conjunction
* `+CS `: alistav sidesõna		/ subordinating conjunction		
* `+Adp `: kaassõna	/ adposition, i.e. pre/postposition	
* `+Pref `: prefiks         / prefix				

Genitiivatribuut pole eraldi kategooria / No special tag for genitive attribute : *angoora+N+Sg+Gen*	

### Alamkategooriad / Sub-pos categories

* `+Prop `: pärisnimi	/ proper name		
* `+Card `: põhiarvsõna	/ cardinal numeral
* `+Ord `: järgarvsõna	/ ordinal numeral

### Võrdlusastmed / Comparation

* `+Comp `: komparatiiv	/ comparative
* `+Superl `: superlatiiv	/ superlative

* hfstol: examples:*
* *asi:* `asi+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # thing)
* *Jaan:* `Jaan+N+Prop+Sg+Nom`
* *asjalik:* `asjalik+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # serious)
* *parem:* `parem+A+Comp+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # better)
* *parim:* `parim+A+Superl+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # best)
* *kaks:* `kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # two)
* *teine:* `teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # second)
* *see:* `see+Pron+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # that)
* *asjastama:* `asjastama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill` (Eng. # objectify)
* *asjatult:* `asjatult+Adv` (Eng. # in vain)
* *hei:* `hei+Interj` (Eng. # hi)
* *ja:* `ja+CC` (Eng. # and)
* *et:* `et+CS` (Eng. # that)
* *kaudu:* `kaudu+Adp` (Eng. # via)
* *eba-:* `eba+Pref` (Eng. # un-, non-)

### Sõnamuutus / Inflection

### Käändsõna             / Noun

### Arv 			/ number

* `+Sg `: ainsus	/ singular
* `+Pl `: mitmus	/ plural

### Kääne	/ Case

* `+Nom `: nimetav			/ nominative	
* *part:* `part+N+Sg+Nom`
* *maja:* `maja+N+Sg+Nom`
* *pardid:* `part+N+Pl+Nom`
* *majad:* `maja+N+Pl+Nom`

* `+Gen `: omastav 			/ genitive	
* *pardi:* `part+N+Sg+Gen`
* *maja:* `maja+N+Sg+Gen`
* *partide:* `part+N+Pl+Gen`
* *majade:* `maja+N+Pl+Gen`

* `+Par `: osastav			/ partitive	
* *parti:* `part+N+Sg+Par`
* *maja:* `maja+N+Sg+Par`
* *parte:* `part+N+Pl+Par`
* *partisid:* `part+N+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare`
* *maju:* `maja+N+Pl+Par`
* *majasid:* `maja+N+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare`

* `+Ill `: sisseütlev			/ illative	
* *parti:* `part+N+Sg+Ill`
* *majja:* `maja+N+Sg+Ill`
* *pardisse:* `part+N+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp`
* *majasse:* `maja+N+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare`
* *partidesse:* `part+N+Pl+Ill`
* *majadesse:* `maja+N+Pl+Ill`
Lühike sisseütlev e suunduv pole eraldi kääne (*parti*, *majja*) / Short illative or additive is not a separate case 

* `+Ine `: seesütlev			/ inessive	
* *pardis:* `part+N+Sg+Ine`
* *majas:* `maja+N+Sg+Ine`
* *partides:* `part+N+Pl+Ine`
* *majades:* `maja+N+Pl+Ine`

* `+Ela `: seestütlev			/ elative	
* *pardist:* `part+N+Sg+Ela`
* *majast:* `maja+N+Sg+Ela`
* *partidest:* `part+N+Pl+Ela`
* *majadest:* `maja+N+Pl+Ela`

* `+All `: alaleütlev			/ allative	
* *pardile:* `part+N+Sg+All`
* *majale:* `maja+N+Sg+All`
* *partidele:* `part+N+Pl+All`
* *majadele:* `maja+N+Pl+All`

* `+Ade `: alalütlev			/ adessive	
* *pardil:* `part+N+Sg+Ade`
* *majal:* `maja+N+Sg+Ade`
* *partidel:* `part+N+Pl+Ade`
* *majadel:* `maja+N+Pl+Ade`

* `+Abl `: alaltütlev			/ ablative	
* *pardilt:* `part+N+Sg+Abl`
* *majalt:* `maja+N+Sg+Abl`
* *partidelt:* `part+N+Pl+Abl`
* *majadelt:* `maja+N+Pl+Abl`

* `+Tra `: saav				/ translative	
* *pardiks:* `part+N+Sg+Tra`
* *majaks:* `maja+N+Sg+Tra`
* *partideks:* `part+N+Pl+Tra`
* *majadeks:* `maja+N+Pl+Tra`

* `+Trm `: rajav				/ terminative	
* *pardini:* `part+N+Sg+Trm`
* *majani:* `maja+N+Sg+Trm`
* *partideni:* `part+N+Pl+Trm`
* *majadeni:* `maja+N+Pl+Trm`

* `+Ess `: olev				/ essive	
* *pardina:* `part+N+Sg+Ess`
* *majana:* `maja+N+Sg+Ess`
* *partidena:* `part+N+Pl+Ess`
* *majadena:* `maja+N+Pl+Ess`

* `+Abe `: ilmaütlev			/ abessive	
* *pardita:* `part+N+Sg+Abe`
* *majata:* `maja+N+Sg+Abe`
* *partideta:* `part+N+Pl+Abe`
* *majadeta:* `maja+N+Pl+Abe`

* `+Com `: kaasaütlev			/ comitative	
* *pardiga:* `part+N+Sg+Com`
* *majaga:* `maja+N+Sg+Com`
* *partidega:* `part+N+Pl+Com`
* *majadega:* `maja+N+Pl+Com`

### Verb

Verbil on finiitsed (pöördelised) ja infiniitsed (nn käänduvad) vormid. 
Pöördelistel vormidel on kategooriad: 
tegumood, aeg, kõneviis, isik, arv, kõneliik
(tegumood ja aeg on ka mõnedel infiniitsetel vormidel).

Verbs have finite (conjugable) and infinite ("declinable") forms.
The finite forms have categories: 
voice, tense, mood, person, number, negation
(some infinite forms also have voice and tense).

### Pöördelised vormid / Conjugable forms

### Tegumood		/ Voice

* `+Impers `: umbisikuline	/ impersonal
* `+Pers `: isikuline	/ personal

### Aeg			/ Tense

* `+Prs `: olevik	/ present
* `+Prt `: minevik	/ past (i.e. not present)

Lihtminevik = minevik / Past imperfect = past

Täisminevik / Past perfect: *olema* (pres) + *nud/tud/dud* (*olen teinud*)

Enneminevik / Past pluperfect: *olema* (impf) + *nud/tud/dud* (*olin teinud*)

### Kõneviis		/ Mood

* `+Ind `: kindel	/ indicative
* `+Cond `: tingiv	/ conditional
* `+Imprt `: käskiv	/ imperative / jussive
* `+Quot `: kaudne	/ quotative

### Pööre ja arv	/ Person and number

* `+Sg1 `: ainsuse 1. pööre	/ singular 1st person
* `+Sg2 `: ainsuse 2. pööre	/ singular 2nd person
* `+Sg3 `: ainsuse 3. pööre	/ singular 3rd person
* `+Pl1 `: mitmuse 1. pööre	/ plural   1st person
* `+Pl2 `: mitmuse 2. pööre	/ plural   2nd person
* `+Pl3 `: mitmuse 3. pööre	/ plural   3rd person

### Kõneliik		/ Polarity

* `+Aff `: jaatav kõne	/ affirmative
* `+Neg `: eitav kõne	/ negative

### Infiniitsed (nn käänduvad) verbivormid / Infinite ("declinable") verb forms

* `+Sup `: ma-tegevusnimi / supine (ma-infinitive)

* `+Inf `: da-tegevusnimi / infinitive (da-infinitive)a

* `+Ger `: des-vorm	 / gerund (des-form)	

* `+Prc `: kesksõna	 / participle

### Kategooriate võimalikud kombinatsioonid / Possible combinations of categories

allikas / source :
[Heiki-Jaan Kaalep. Eesti verbi vormistik. Keel ja kirjandus 1/2015 lk 1-15.](http://kjk.eki.ee/ee/issues/2015/1/582) 

The categories are given in the order in which the allomorphs (if they can be
distinguished) that represent them are attached to the word stem (note that the
treatment of allomorphs is sloppy here). The justification is that the
categories are not equal, but form an hierarchy: those closer to the word end 
tend to be more optional, more often non-specified.   

1. **voice:** personal vs. impersonal (0-morph vs. *t/d(aiu)*), eg. *elaks* vs.
*elataks*, *elav* vs. *elatav*
1. **tense:** present vs. past (0-morph vs. *s/si/nu*), e.g. *elan* vs. *elasin*,
*elaks* vs. *elanuks*
1. **mood:** indicative vs. conditional vs imperative vs quotative
(0-morph vs. *ks* vs. *k/g(ue)* vs. *vat*)
1. **person+number:** notice that in personal present and past conditional, imperative 
and quotative moods one form is underspecified for person+number
1. **negation:** affirmative vs. negative. It manifests itself via
lexical means: it is either present in an exceptional wordform (some forms of
*olema*) or gets adhered to a form, normally used in affirmative,
from an immediately preceding word *ei*, *ega* or *ära* (e.g. *ei elaks*).
The only case when negation has a dedicated form of its own is impersonal
present indicative negative (e.g. *ei elata*).  

The forms of negative words *pole* and *ära* are included in order to capture really all 
the combinations; 
also note that for *olema*, there are some constellations of categories that are the same for
a wordform beginning with *ole-* and *pole-* 

### ---- Personal finite forms ----

* *elan:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff`
* *elad:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff`
* *elab:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff`
* *elame:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff`
* *elate:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff`
* *elavad:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff`

\\
* *ela:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg`
* *pole:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg`
* *ole:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg`

NB! *ei ole* = *pole*

* *elaksin:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff`
* *elaksid:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff`
* *elaks:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond`
* *elaksime:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff`
* *elaksite:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff`
* *elaksid:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff`

\\
* *poleksin:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Neg`
* *poleksid:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Neg`
* *poleks:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Neg`
* *poleksime:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Neg`
* *poleksite:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Neg`
* *poleksid:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Neg`

\\
* *ela:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2`
* *elagu:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt`
* *elagem:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1`
* *elage:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2`

\\
* *ära:* `ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2+Neg`
* *ärgu:* `ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Neg`
* *ärgem:* `ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Neg`
* *ärme:* `ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Neg+Usage/Rare`
* *ärge:* `ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2+Neg`

\\
* *elavat:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot`
* *polevat:* `olema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot+Neg`

\\ 
* *elasin:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff`
* *elasid:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff`
* *elas:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff`
* *elasime:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff`
* *elasite:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff`
* *elasid:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff`

\\
* *elanud:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg`
* *polnud:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg`
* *olnud:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg`

NB! *ei olnud* = *polnud*

* *elanuksin:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff`
* *elanuksid:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff`
* *elanuks:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond`
* *elanuksime:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff`
* *elanuksite:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff`
* *elanuksid:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff`

\\
* *polnuksin:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Neg`
* *polnuksid:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Neg`
* *polnuks:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Neg`
* *polnuksime:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Neg`
* *polnuksite:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Neg`
* *polnuksid:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Neg`

\\
elanud: elama+V+Pers+Prt+Imprt: 1.11.2016 ei genereerita ega tunta ära / not recognized nor generated as of Nov 1, 2016
* *ärnud:* `ära+V+Pers+Prt+Imprt+Neg`

\\
* *elanuvat:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Quot`
* *polnuvat:* `olema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot+Neg`

### ---- Personal infinite forms ----

* *elav:* `elama+V+Pers+Prs+Prc`
* *elanud:* `elama+V+Pers+Prt+Prc`

(on, oli, ...) + V+Pers+Prt+Prc = some analytical personal form 

* *elama:* `elama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill`
* *elamas:* `elama+V+Pers+Sup+Ine`
* *elamast:* `elama+V+Pers+Sup+Ela`
* *elamaks:* `elama+V+Pers+Sup+Tra`
* *elamata:* `elama+V+Pers+Sup+Abe`

### ---- Impersonal finite forms ----

* *elatakse:* `elama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff`
* *elata:* `elama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg`

* *polda:* `olema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg`
* *olda:* `olema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg`

NB! ei olda = polda

* *elataks:* `elama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond`
* *poldaks:* `olema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Neg`

\\
* *elatagu:* `elama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt`
* *ärdagu:* `ära+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Neg`

\\
* *elatavat:* `elama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot`
* *poldavat:* `olema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Neg`

\\
* *elati:* `elama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff`
* *elatud:* `elama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg`

* *poldud:* `olema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg`
* *oldud:* `olema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg`

NB! ei oldud = poldud

* *elatuks:* `elama+V+Impers+Prt+Cond`
* *polduks:* `olema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Neg`

### ---- Impersonal infinite forms ----

* *elatav:* `elama+V+Impers+Prs+Prc`
* *elatud:* `elama+V+Impers+Prt+Prc`

(*on*, *oli*, ...) + V+Impers+Prt+Prc = some analytical personal form 

* *elatama:* `elama+V+Impers+Sup`

### ---- Infinite forms with no voice category ----

* *elada:* `elama+V+Inf`
* *elades:* `elama+V+Ger`

### Exceptional cases:

personal present (Prs not implemented????), 3 words:  *kuulukse*, *tunnukse*, *näikse*

* *kuulukse:* `kuulukse+V`

### Negation verb 

* *ei:* `ei+V+Neg`

Analytical forms (*olen elanud*, *olin elanud*, *oleksin elanud*, *ei olnud elanud*,
*ei olnuks elanud* etc) are not treated here...

### Partikkel -gi/-ki / Particle -gi/-ki
